District of Columbia statutes.
50-2304.05

Judicial review.

Appeals from decisions of the appeals board shall be by application for the allowance of an appeal filed in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia within 30 days of the decision of the appeals board; provided, that appeals from the suspension or revocation of one’s license or privilege to drive shall continue to be governed by § 2-510. Except to the extent that this chapter provides otherwise, the manner of and standards for appeals to the Superior Court of the District of Columbia shall be as set forth in § 2-510.

History

Sept. 12, 1978, D.C. Law 2-104, § 405, 25 DCR 1275

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 40-635.
1973 Ed., § 40-1125.